Utah statutes.
7-1-711.   Mobile facilities -- Approval required for operation.

No financial institution may operate a mobile facility in this state at which deposits are received, checks paid, or money lent without the prior written approval of the commissioner.



Amended by Chapter 133, 1991 General Session

